apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="/quisque__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quisque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuiusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuique</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quemque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quoque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quisque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuiusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuique</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quemque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quoque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quidque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuiusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuique</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quidque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quoque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quique</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quorumque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quibusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quosque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quibusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quaeque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quarumque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quibusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quasque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quibusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quaeque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quorumque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quibusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quaeque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quibusque</l>
          <r>quisque<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="quisque"><i></i><par n="/quisque__prn"/></e>
